Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1805
State medicaid
plan; application for amendment; tax; when due.

(1)
On or before July 1, 2004, the department shall submit an application to the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services amending the state medicaid plan to provide for
utilization of money in the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection
Fund to increase medicaid payments to intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities.

(2) The tax imposed under section 68-1803 is not due and
payable until such amendment to the state medicaid plan is approved by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

Laws 2004, LB 841, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 20.